Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2110
Functional classification; specific criteria; assignment to highways, roads, streets.

Following adoption and publication of the specific criteria required by section 39-2109, the Department of Transportation, after consultation with the appropriate local authorities in each instance, shall assign a functional classification to each segment of highway, road, and street in this state. Before assigning any such classification, the department shall make reasonable effort to resolve any differences of opinion between the department and any county or municipality. Whenever a new road or street is to be opened or an existing road or street is to be extended, the department shall, upon a request from the operating jurisdiction, assign a functional classification to such segment in accordance with the specific criteria established under section 39-2109.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 10, p. 1123;

Laws 2008, LB1068, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 149.